Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2437
Formal testacy proceedings; vacation of order for other cause.

For good cause shown, an order in a formal testacy proceeding may be modified or vacated within the time allowed for appeal.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 115, UPC § 3-413.

A motion to vacate or modify which is filed within the time limitation contemplated by this section is similar in nature to a motion for a new trial in district court and the overruling of such motion is itself a final order which extends the thirty-day appeal time from the entry of the original order complained of to the date upon which the motion to vacate or modify is overruled. DeVries v. Rix, 203 Neb. 392, 279 N.W.2d 89 (1979).

To show "good cause", as used in this section, means to demonstrate a logical reason or legal ground, based on fact or law, why an otherwise final order of the county court should be vacated or modified. DeVries v. Rix, 203 Neb. 392, 279 N.W.2d 89 (1979).

Under this section, a movant must support a claim of meritorious objection or defense by good faith averment of facts, not simply legal conclusions. In re Estate of Rolenc, 7 Neb. App. 833, 585 N.W.2d 526 (1998).